Utah statutes.
49-11-305.   Self-insurance option -- Purchase of liability insurance.

(1)  The office may self insure and may purchase commercial insurance in any amount.

(2)  The office may also purchase excess commercial insurance above the limits provided by the Governmental Immunity Act against any:

(a)  risk created or recognized by the Governmental Immunity Act; or

(b)  other action for which the board, office, or any of its employees, may be held liable.

